Hawaii statutes.
§174C-32 Coordination. (a) Respective
portions of the water resource protection and water quality plans, and the
water use and development plans of each county, shall be developed together to
achieve maximum coordination.

(b) The development of the Hawaii water plan
or any portion thereof shall proceed in coordination with and with attention to
the Hawaii state plan described in chapter 226.

(c) The Hawaii water plan and its constituent
parts, except for the water quality plan, shall be adopted by the commission
not later than three years from July 1, 1987. The commission shall
receive the water quality plan from the department of health and incorporate
this part in the Hawaii water plan. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 197,
§3]

Revision Note

"July 1,
1987" substituted for "the effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next